Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.273

Washington professional educator standards board—Social-emotional learning.

By January 1, 2020, in order to ensure that principals can recognize signs of emotional or behavioral distress in students and appropriately refer students for assistance and support, the Washington professional educator standards board shall incorporate into principal knowledge, skill, and performance standards the social-emotional learning standards, benchmarks, and related competencies described in RCW 28A.410.270.

[ 2019 c 386 s 4.]